tr: Entegre araç fonksiyonları: Damak düşürücü; Damak kaydırıcı; Şişe açacağı; CO2 kartuşu tutucu; Zincir sökücü; Pedal anahtarı; Hızlı bağlantı yuvası; Jant teli kancası; Lastik fitil aleti; Supap iğnesi sökücü; Diğer
ko: 통합 도구 기능: 비드 드로퍼; 비드 슬라이더; 병따개; CO2 카트리지 홀더; 체인 브레이커; 페달 렌치; 퀵링크 보관함; 스포크 후크; 타이어 플러그 공구; 밸브 코어 리무버; 기타
da: Integrerede værktøjsfunktioner: Bead dropper; Bead slider; Oplukker; Holder til CO2-patron; Kædeadskiller; Pedalnøgle; Opbevaring af samleled; Egerkrog; Lappeværktøj til dæk; Ventilkegleværktøj; Andet
cs: Obsažené funkce nástroje: Nástroj pro nasazení patky; Posuvník patky; Otvírák na lahve; Držák na CO2 bombičky; Nýtovač řetězu; Klíč na pedály; Úložný prostor na rychlospojky; Háček na dráty; Nástroj na opravu knotem; Nástroj na demontáž vnitřku ventilku; Jiné
es: Funciones de la herramienta integradas: Aplicador de talón; Deslizador de talón; Abrebotellas; Soporte para cartucho de CO2; Tronchacadenas; Llave de pedal; Almacenamiento de eslabón rápido; Gancho para radios; Herramienta de tapón de neumático; Extractor de núcleo de válvula; Otro
zh-CN: 集成工具功能: 胎唇压具; 胎唇滑块; 开瓶器; CO2 气瓶架; 截链器; 脚踏扳手; 魔术扣收纳; 辐条钩; 补胎胶条工具; 气门芯拆卸工具; 其他
sl-SI: Integrirane funkcije orodja: Orodje za rob pnevmatike (bead dropper); Drsnik za rob pnevmatike; Odpirač za steklenice; Držalo za kartušo CO2; Orodje za verigo; Ključ za pedale; Shranjevanje hitrih členov; Kljuka za napero; Orodje za krpanje pnevmatik; Orodje za odstranjevanje jedra ventila; Drugo
sk-SK: Integrované funkcie nástrojov: Nástroj na zatlačenie pätky plášťa; Kĺzadlo pätky; Otvárač na fľaše; Držiak CO2 bombičky; Nitovač reťaze; Kľúč na pedále; Úložný priestor na rýchlospojku; Háčik na výplet; Nástroj na opravu defektu (knôtmi); Odstraňovač jadra ventilu; Iné
de: Integrierte Werkzeugfunktionen: Wulstdrücker; Wulstgleiter; Flaschenöffner; CO2-Kartuschenhalter; Kettennieter; Pedalschlüssel; Kettenschloss-Aufbewahrung; Speichenhaken; Tubeless-Reparaturwerkzeug; Ventileinsatzentferner; Sonstige
pl: Zintegrowane Functionsnarzędzia: Bead dropper (do zdejmowania opon); Bead slider (do zakładania opon); Otwieracz do butelek; Uchwyt na nabój CO2; Skuwacz do łańcucha; Klucz do pedałów; Schowek na spinkę do łańcucha; Haczyk do szprych; Narzędzie do kołkowania opon; Klucz do rdzeni zaworów; Inne
fr: Fonctions d’outil intégrées: Repousse-tringle; Pince pour tringle de pneu; Décapsuleur; Porte-cartouche de CO2; Dérive-chaîne; Clé à pédale; Rangement pour maillons rapides; Crochet à rayons; Outil de réparation de pneus; Démonte-obus de valve; Autre
fi: Integroidut työkalutoiminnot: Renkaanirrottaja; Renkaanluisuttaja; Pullonavaaja; CO2-patruunan pidike; Ketjunkatkaisija; Poljinavain; Pikalukon säilytystila; Pinnakoukku; Renkaanpaikkaustyökalu; Venttiilin sielun irrottaja; Muu
hu: Beépített szerszámfunkciók: Peremlenyomó; Peremcsúsztató; Sörnyitó; CO2-patrontartó; Láncbontó; Pedálkulcs; Patentszemtartó; Küllőkampó; Gumidugózó szerszám; Szelepmag-kiszedő; Egyéb
lt-LT: Integruotos įrankio funkcijos: Padangos krašto įleidėjas; Padangos krašto slystuvas; Butelių atidarytuvas; CO2 balionėlio laikiklis; Grandinės iškalklis; Pedalų raktas; Greitosios jungties dėklas; Stipinų kabliukas; Padangų kaiščių įrankis; Ventilio šerdies išėmiklis; Kita
vi: Chức năng công cụ tích hợp: Dụng cụ nạy mép lốp; Dụng cụ trượt mép lốp; Dụng cụ mở nắp chai; Khay để bình CO2; Dụng cụ cắt xích; Cờ lê vặn bàn đạp; Chỗ cất khóa xích; Móc căm xe; Dụng cụ vá lốp; Dụng cụ tháo lõi van; Khác
zh-TW: 內建工具功能: 落胎器; 滑胎器; 開瓶器; CO2 氣瓶固定座; 打鏈器; 踏板扳手; 快扣收納盒; 輻條鉤; 補胎工具; 氣門芯拆卸器; 其他
bg-BG: Вградени функции на инструмента: Инструмент за борд на гума; Плъзгач за борд на гума; Отварачка за бутилки; Държач за CO2 флакон; Инструмент за верига; Ключ за педали; Отделение за звено за бърз монтаж; Кука за спици; Инструмент за фитили за гуми; Инструмент за иглички на вентили; Други
pt-BR: Funções integradas da ferramenta: Extrator de talão (Bead dropper); Deslizador de talão; Abridor de garrafas; Suporte para cartucho de CO2; Extrator de pino de corrente; Chave de pedal; Armazenamento de quick-link; Gancho para raios; Ferramenta para remendo de pneu; Saca-válvula; Outra
nl: Geïntegreerde gereedschap functies: Bead-dropper; Bead-slider; Flessenopener; Houder voor CO2-patroon; Kettingpons; Pedaalsleutel; Opslag voor snelschakel; Spaakhaak; Bandenplug-tool; Ventielkernverwijderaar; Overig
ro-RO: Funcții integrate ale instrumentului: Dispozitiv de coborâre a talonului; Dispozitiv de glisare a talonului; Desfăcător de sticle; Suport pentru cartușe CO2; Presă de lanț; Cheie pentru pedale; Depozitare pentru verigă rapidă; Cârlig pentru spițe; Sculă pentru dopuri de anvelopă; Dispozitiv de extragere a miezului de valvă; Altele
it: Funzioni dello strumento integrate: Attrezzo per stallonare; Pattino stallonatore; Apribottiglie; Portacartucce di CO₂; Smagliacatena; Chiave per pedali; Scomparto per falsamaglia; Tiraraggi; Strumento per inserire i vermicelli; Smonta valvole; Altro
en: Integrated tool functions: Bead dropper; Bead slider; Bottle opener; CO2 cartridge holder; Chain breaker; Pedal wrench; Quick-link storage; Spoke hook; Tire plug tool; Valve core remover; Other
pt-PT: Funções da ferramenta integrada: Rebaixador de talão; Deslizador de talão; Abre-cápsulas; Suporte para botija de CO2; Extrator de corrente; Chave de pedais; Arrumação para elo rápido; Gancho de raios; Ferramenta para reparação de furos; Extrator de núcleo de válvula; Outro
th: Functionsเครื่องมือแบบบูรณาการ: เครื่องมือปลดขอบยาง; เครื่องมือเลื่อนขอบยาง; ที่เปิดขวด; ที่เก็บหลอด CO2; ที่ตัดโซ่; ประแจขันบันไดจักรยาน; ที่เก็บข้อต่อปลดเร็ว; ตะขอเกี่ยวซี่ลวด; เครื่องมือปะยางแบบแทง; ที่ถอดแกนวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
nb: Integrerte funksjoner: Verktøy for dekkant; Dekkglider; Flaskeåpner; Holder for CO2-patron; Kjedekutter; Pedalnøkkel; Oppbevaring for kjedelås; Eikekrok; Dekkpluggverktøy; Ventilkjernedemonterer; Annet
el: Ενσωματωμένες λειτουργίες εργαλείων: Εργαλείο αφαίρεσης ελαστικού; Bead slider; Ανοιχτήρι μπουκαλιών; Θήκη αμπούλας CO2; Κόφτης αλυσίδας; Κλειδί πεντάλ; Αποθήκευση quick-link; Γάντζος ακτίνας; Εργαλείο επιδιόρθωσης ελαστικού; Εξωλκέας βαλβίδας; Άλλο
ja: 統合ツールFunctions: ビードドロッパー; ビードスライダー; 栓抜き; CO2カートリッジホルダー; チェーンカッター; ペダルレンチ; クイックリンク収納; スポークフック; タイヤプラグツール; バルブコアリムーバー; その他
ru: Интегрированные функции инструмента: Инструмент для усадки борта покрышки; Направляющая борта покрышки; Открывалка для бутылок; Держатель баллона CO2; Выжимка цепи; Педальный ключ; Отсек для замка цепи; Крюк для спиц; Инструмент для установки жгутов; Съемник золотника; Другое
sv: Integrerade verktygsfunktioner: Bead dropper; Bead slider; Kapsylöppnare; Hållare för CO2-patron; Kedjebrytare; Pedalnyckel; Förvaring för kedjelås; Ekerkrok; Verktyg för däckplugg; Verktyg för ventilkärna; Annat
hr-HR: Integrirane značajke alata: Alat za gume (bead dropper); Alat za gume (bead slider); Otvarač za boce; Držač za CO2 patronu; Alat za lanac; Ključ za pedale; Spremište za brze spojnice; Kuka za žbice; Alat za krpanje guma; Alat za uklanjanje jezgre ventila; Ostalo